Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 1 ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY — HEALTH
§ 39-174. Committee duties — Meetings.

The committee’s duties shall include:

Developing a manual providing guidance for the use, storage, management and disposal of wood or mill yard debris to prevent public nuisances and minimize or prevent harmful environmental impacts. Guidance provided by the manual may be incorporated or adopted by reference in the rules of the department or other appropriate state agencies.

Considering and developing specific solutions to unforeseen wood or mill yard debris use, storage, management or disposal as needed.

Developing and sharing knowledge related to the use, storage, management and disposal of wood or mill yard debris including ways to constructively use or reclaim the debris.

Making recommendations for any necessary permits, rules or legislation related to the use, storage, management or disposal of wood or mill yard debris.

The committee shall meet on an as needed basis to implement the purpose of sections 39-171 through 39-174, Idaho Code. A committee member or member of the public may request a meeting by sending a written request to the department describing the reason for the meeting, or the department may schedule a meeting at the discretion of the director. Upon receiving the request, the department shall contact all committee members and arrange a time and place most convenient to the majority of the members. Meetings may be conducted using telephonic devices or other methods that allow adequate communication among members.

§ 39-175. [Reserved.]

The legislature finds:

That navigable waters within the state are one of the state’s most valuable natural resources;

That it is in the public interest to promote effective and efficient regulation of the discharge of pollutants into navigable waters, and that the state should control such permitting decisions as authorized under the federal clean water act;

That the clean water act allows a state to develop and implement, with approval from the United States environmental protection agency, a national pollutant discharge elimination system (NPDES) program to be administered by the state;

That the clean water act, as amended, and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, establishes complex and detailed provisions for regulation of those who discharge pollutants into navigable waters;

That a state program to implement permitting decisions as authorized in the clean water act, and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, may enable the state to issue flexible permits consistent with the clean water act and avoid the existence of duplicative, overlapping or conflicting state and federal regulatory and enforcement processes;

That a state program must be run with a minimum of federal interference in permitting, inspection and enforcement activities and that all state permitting actions under the approved state program are to be state actions and are not subject to consultation under the endangered species act or analysis under the provisions of the national environmental policy act. There should be no conditions of approval of the state program that have the effect of undermining or circumventing these principles;

That the decision to accept delegation of authority from the environmental protection agency to operate an NPDES program has significant public policy implications that should be made by the legislature.

Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to establish requirements that must be satisfied prior to legislative approval of a permitting program that complies with the clean water act and incorporates flexible permitting procedures and rules to be promulgated by the board.

§ 39-175B. Relationship between state and federal law.

The legislature cannot conveniently or advantageously set forth in this chapter all the requirements of all of the regulations which have been or will be established under the clean water act. However, any state permitting program must avoid the existence of duplicative, overlapping or conflicting state and federal regulatory systems. Further, the board may promulgate rules to implement a state permitting program but such rules shall not impose conditions or requirements more stringent or broader in scope than the clean water act and regulations adopted pursuant thereto. Further, the department will not require Idaho pollutant discharge elimination system (IPDES) permits for activities and sources not required to have permits by the United States environmental protection agency.

§ 39-175C. Approval of Idaho pollutant discharge elimination system program.

The department is authorized to implement an Idaho pollutant discharge elimination system (IPDES) program consistent with the requirements of this section. The program shall not include the authority to issue permits for any discharge of sewage from vessels, effluent from properly functioning marine engines, laundry, shower, and galley sink wastes, or any other discharge incidental to the normal operation of a vessel. This exclusion does not apply to rubbish, trash, garbage, or other such materials discharged overboard; nor to other discharges when the vessel is operating in a capacity other than as a means of transportation, such as when used as an energy or mining facility, a storage facility or a seafood processing facility, or when secured to a storage facility or a seafood processing facility or when secured to the bed of a lake or river, contiguous zone or waters of the United States for the purpose of mineral or oil exploration or development.

The board is authorized to proceed with negotiated rulemaking and all other actions necessary to maintain approval of the IPDES program by the United States environmental protection agency including rules authorizing the collection of reasonable fees for processing and implementing an IPDES permit program. Such fees shall not be assessed or collected unless the state maintains an approved IPDES program consistent with the requirements of this section.

Any memorandum of agreement negotiated by the director to maintain approval to operate an IPDES program shall be binding on the state of Idaho upon enactment of this statute.

Implementation of the IPDES program shall not occur prior to statutory enactment of implementing legislation and authorization of a memorandum of agreement as specified in subsection(3) of this section.

The director, as appropriate, shall establish agreements with other state agencies with expertise to administer the IPDES program.

No provision of this chapter shall be interpreted as to supersede, abrogate, injure or create rights to divert or store water and apply water to beneficial uses established under section 3, article XV, of the constitution of the state of Idaho, and title 42, Idaho Code.

Nothing in this section is intended to supersede any existing agreements between federal, state or local agencies regarding authority over inspections, enforcement or other obligations under the clean water act.

§ 39-175D. Idaho pollutant discharge elimination system permit decisions and appeal of decisions.

Prior to making a final decision regarding Idaho pollutant discharge elimination system (IPDES) permits authorized by sections 39-175A through 39-175C, Idaho Code, the department shall provide the public notice and an opportunity to comment on the department’s tentative decision. The department shall develop an administrative record that shall, at a minimum, include the tentative decision, all comments received, the department’s response to comments and the basis for the department’s decision. The decision-making process and the final decision with respect to IPDES permits shall not be subject to the contested case provisions set forth in chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including without limitation, chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, the exclusive means of appealing the department’s final decision regarding an IPDES permit shall be as set forth in this section and in rules authorized by this section and sections 39-175A through 39-175C, Idaho Code. Any person aggrieved by the department’s final decision regarding an IPDES permit may appeal that decision. The appeal of the decision shall be heard by a hearing officer appointed by the director from a pool of hearing officers approved by the board. Hearing officers should be persons with technical expertise or experience in the issues presented in appeals. All appeals shall be based solely on the record developed by the department as required by subsection (1) of this section and the rules adopted by the board, and no further or additional evidence may be presented except as provided in rules adopted by the board.

No person, including the director and hearing officer, who has or shares authority to approve all or portions of IPDES permits either in the first instance, as modified or reissued, or on appeal, shall have a conflict of interest as defined in 40 CFR 123.25(c).

Any person aggrieved by a final determination of the hearing officer regarding an IPDES permit may secure judicial review by filing a petition for review as prescribed under the rules adopted by the board and the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. The petition for review shall be served upon the hearing officer, the director of the department and the attorney general. Such service shall be jurisdictional, and the provisions of this section shall be the exclusive procedure for appeal.

The board shall adopt rules consistent with the provisions of this section.

§ 39-175E. Idaho pollutant discharge elimination system program investigation, inspection and enforcement authorities.

All investigation, inspection and enforcement authorities and requirements set forth in the environmental protection and health act, sections 39-101 through 39-130, Idaho Code, shall be available to the department and shall apply with respect to the Idaho pollutant discharge elimination system (IPDES) program. Such authorities include, without limitation, the authorities in sections 39-108, 39-109 and 39-117, Idaho Code, which shall be available to the department to conduct investigations, inspections and enforcement relating to violations of the rules, permits, requirements or orders issued or adopted pursuant to sections 39-175A through 39-175E, Idaho Code.

The department is further authorized to enforce, through the authorities provided in this section, pretreatment standards, including local limits, developed and adopted by publicly owned treatment works, as required by 40 CFR 403.10(f)(1)(iv).

§ 39-175F. IPDES program fund established.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a fund to be known as the “IPDES Program Fund,” which shall consist of all moneys received from fees collected from facilities obtaining an Idaho pollutant discharge elimination system (IPDES) permit or coverage under a general permit pursuant to section 39-175C(2), Idaho Code, and the rules promulgated pursuant thereto. Such fees shall be collected by the department and shall be paid into the IPDES program fund, which is hereby established, reserved, set aside, appropriated and made available until expended, used and administered consistent with this section.

All moneys deposited in the IPDES program fund and all interest earned thereon shall be kept in the IPDES program fund and shall be expended pursuant to appropriation for the costs and expenses incurred by the department in performing the duties and the exercise of its powers in carrying out the IPDES program including, but not limited to, compliance, training, technical, legal and administrative support and proceedings necessary for implementing the program required under the IPDES program as provided in this chapter.

Pending such expenditure and use, surplus moneys in the IPDES program fund established in this section shall be invested by the state treasurer in the manner provided for idle state moneys in the state treasury by section 67-1210, Idaho Code. Interest earned on all such investments shall be paid into the IPDES program fund.

§ 39-176A. Legislative findings and purpose.

The legislature finds that:

A domestic supply of phosphate fertilizers is critical to our nation’s food security and Idaho’s agricultural economy;

The production of phosphoric acid is a key ingredient in phosphate fertilizers and, given Idaho’s rich supply of phosphate rock, the state is home to phosphoric acid production facilities;

Phosphogypsum is a calcium sulfate by-product produced by the reaction of sulfuric acid with phosphate rock to produce phosphoric acid and is disposed of and placed in phosphogypsum stacks near phosphoric acid production facilities;

The United States congress and the environmental protection agency exempted certain high-volume, low-toxicity solid wastes, including phosphogypsum and process water from phosphoric acid production, from regulation as a hazardous waste under subtitle C of the resource conservation and recovery act (42 U.S.C. 6901 et seq.), as amended; and

To both facilitate and encourage the continued manufacturing of phosphate fertilizers, and to benefit the surface water and groundwater environmental resources, the legislature recognizes the need for the department of environmental quality to develop a program to assure the proper design and construction of phosphogypsum stacks and phosphogypsum stack systems.

Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to authorize the board of environmental quality to initiate negotiated rulemaking consistent with the requirements of sections 39-176A through 39-176F, Idaho Code.

§ 39-176B. Scope and applicability.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as superseding, amending, or modifying the mineral processing waste exemption provided in 40 CFR 261.4(b) (7) and IDAPA 58.01.05.005, for process wastewater and phosphogypsum from phosphoric acid production.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to supersede or modify any existing agreement with or approvals from the environmental protection agency or the department of environmental quality relating to the construction of a phosphogypsum stack, phosphogypsum stack system, or component thereof.

The requirements in sections 42-1710 through 42-1721, Idaho Code, shall not apply to phosphogypsum stacks and phosphogypsum stack systems.

This chapter establishes minimum design and construction requirements to ensure that phosphogypsum stack system impoundments meet critical safety standards and do not cause unplanned releases into the environment.

§ 39-176C. Definitions.

Wherever used or referred to in sections 39-176A through 39-176F, Idaho Code, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

“Auxiliary holding pond” (AHP) means a lined storage pond typically used to hold process wastewater for the purpose of increasing system storage above that otherwise provided by a collection pond or ponds.

“Board” means the Idaho board of environmental quality.

“Lateral expansion” means a horizontal expansion of the waste boundaries of an existing phosphogypsum stack system.

“Leachate” means liquid or drainable pore water that has passed through or emerged from phosphogypsum and that may be collected within the phosphogypsum stack system or in a seepage collection drain.

“Operator” means any person or persons, any partnership, limited partnership, corporation, or any association of persons, either natural or artificial, that own, control, or direct the management of a phosphogypsum stack.

“Phosphogypsum” means calcium sulfate and by-products produced by the reaction of an acid, such as sulfuric acid or fluoride acid, with phosphate rock to produce phosphoric acid.

“Phosphogypsum stack” means any defined geographic area associated with a phosphoric acid production facility in which phosphogypsum and process wastewater from phosphoric acid production are disposed of or stored, other than within a fully enclosed building, container, or tank.

“Phosphogypsum stack system” means the defined geographic area associated with the phosphoric acid production facility in which phosphogypsum and process wastewater are disposed of or stored together, including all components such as pumps, piping, ditches, drainage, conveyances, water control structures, collection ponds, cooling ponds, decant ponds, surge ponds, auxiliary holding ponds, and any other collection or conveyance system associated with the transport of phosphogypsum from the plant to the phosphogypsum stack, its management at the stack, and the process wastewater return to phosphoric acid production to the phosphogypsum stack. This includes toe drain systems and ditches and other leachate collection systems, but does not include conveyances within the confines of the fertilizer production plant or emergency diversion impoundments used in emergency circumstances caused by power outages or rainfall events.

“Process wastewater” means process wastewater from phosphoric acid production operations.

§ 39-176D. Board powers.

In addition to the other duties and powers of the board prescribed by law, the board is granted and shall be entitled to proceed with negotiated rulemaking and adopt rules consistent with the requirements of sections 39-176A through 39-176F, Idaho Code, regarding the construction and lateral expansion and the management of phosphogypsum stacks and phosphogypsum stack systems and other such rules as may be necessary to carry out the intent and purposes of sections 39-176A through 39-176F, Idaho Code.

§ 39-176E. Construction requirements for new phosphogypsum stacks — Lateral expansions of existing phosphogypsum stacks.

Any operator desiring to construct a new phosphogypsum stack, a material component thereof, or a lateral expansion shall submit to the department of environmental quality for review and approval prior to commencing construction a design and construction plan, including construction quality control, that includes minimum design and construction requirements to control and minimize the movement of waste and waste constituents into the environment. Plans and specifications submitted to satisfy the requirements of sections 39-176A through 39-176F, Idaho Code, shall be certified by a registered professional engineer. The minimum design requirements include the following features and standards:

Run-on and runoff controls for the phosphogypsum stack systems for the collection, control, and treatment, as needed, of run-on and runoff from the systems;

Liner and leachate control systems that achieve the following minimum design standards:

Phosphogypsum stacks shall be constructed atop a composite liner or approved alternative of equivalent hydraulic conductivity and durability. Liners shall be constructed of materials that have appropriate physical, chemical, and mechanical properties to prevent failure;

All liner and leachate control system components shall have appropriate quality control and quality assurance standards, specifications, and procedures for construction.

Phosphogypsum stacks shall have a leachate control system. Any leachate emanating from a phosphogypsum stack system shall be routed to a collection pond, such as a decant pond or similar water structure, to be contained within the system or recirculated to the production plant, or, if discharged, treated if required to meet applicable water quality and discharge requirements. Collection ponds shall be constructed with a composite liner or an approved alternative of equivalent hydraulic conductivity and durability;

Auxiliary holding ponds shall be designed with a synthetic liner or an approved alternative of equivalent hydraulic conductivity and durability; and

Process wastewater conveyances shall be constructed with a liner or pipe.

Perimeter dikes that shall incorporate minimum design standards for freeboard, safety, and slope stability design factors, construction methods, and other related parameters. Appropriate quality control and quality assurance standards, specifications, and procedures for perimeter dike construction shall be implemented;

Any lateral expansion must be constructed in accordance with the same requirements as a new phosphogypsum stack. Except for incidental deposits of phosphogypsum entrained in the process wastewater, or conditioned phosphogypsum used as a cushion layer against rock slope, placement of phosphogypsum outside the phosphogypsum stack footprint is considered a lateral expansion; and

A groundwater monitoring plan.

§ 39-176F. Plan — Approval or rejection by department.

Upon receipt by the department of environmental quality of a design and construction plan submitted by an operator, the department shall have ninety (90) days to review the plan.

Upon determination by the department that a design and construction plan submitted by an operator meets the requirements of this section, the department shall deliver to the operator, in writing, a notice of approval of such plan, and thereafter said plan shall govern and determine the nature and extent of the obligations of the operator for compliance with sections 39-176A through 39-176F, Idaho Code, with respect to the phosphogypsum stack system for which the plan was submitted.

If the department determines that a design and construction plan fails to fulfill the requirements of this section, it shall deliver to the operator, in writing, a notice of rejection of the plan and shall set forth in said notice of rejection the reasons for such a finding. Upon receipt of said notice of rejection, the operator may submit amended plans within forty-five (45) days. The department shall have sixty (60) days to review an amended plan. Upon further determination by the department that the amended plan does not fulfill the provisions of sections 39-176A through 39-176F, Idaho Code, it shall deliver to the operator, in writing, a notice of rejection of the amended plan in the same manner as provided for rejection of the original plan.

A notice of rejection may be appealed by the operator to the board.

The time periods in this section may be adjusted if agreed to by both the department and the operator.

A construction completion report shall be submitted to the department within ninety (90) days of completion of construction activities. The report shall include final record drawings and conformance of construction to the approved design and construction plan, including construction quality control plans for phosphogypsum stack components.

The board may require a fee sufficient for the review and approval of plans and associated documents required by this section.

§ 39-139 — 39-170. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-175A. Legislative findings and purposes.